num.lexd
PATTERNS
VerbPrefix1 VerbStem1
VerbStem2
VerbStem3 VerbSuffix1



LEXICON VerbPrefix1
<plus10>:цIе
<plus0>:

LEXICON VerbSuffix1
<mult20>:къа
<plus0>:

LEXICON VerbStem1
са<one><attr>:сa
Iу<two><attr>:Iу
гIифу<five><attr>:гIифу
ерхьи<six><attr>:ерхьи
ери<seven><attr>:ери
муя<eight><attr>:муя
ерчIу<nine><attr>:ерчIу

LEXICON VerbStem2
йицIу<ten><attr>:йицIу
къа<twenty><attr>:къа
ягъцIур<forty><attr>:ягъцIур

LEXICON VerbStem3
хьибу<three><attr>:хьибу
якьу<four><attr>:якьу
